Idaho statutes. Title 47 MINES AND MINING
Chapter 2
IDAHO GEOLOGICAL SURVEY

Sec.

§ 47-201. Geological survey created — Purpose — Advisory board.

There is hereby created the Idaho geological survey, to be administered as a special program at the university of Idaho under the authority of the board of regents of the university of Idaho. The survey shall be the lead state agency for the collection, interpretation, and dissemination of geologic and mineral data for Idaho. Such information is to be acquired through field and laboratory investigations by the staff of the survey and through cooperative programs with other governmental and private agencies. There is hereby established an advisory board for the survey, consisting of the following members: The director of the survey and board chairperson (nonvoting); the chair of the department of geosciences at Boise state university; the chair of the department of geosciences at Idaho state university; the chair of the department of geological sciences at the university of Idaho; a representative from the mining and mineral processing industry selected by the director; the governor of the state of Idaho or his designated representative; a member of the board of land commissioners or their designated representative; the president or his designee of the Idaho association of professional geologists; and two (2) members at large selected by the director from other state or federal organizations, or from the private sector with a direct interest in the survey’s programs, both serving two (2) year staggered terms; all of whom shall serve as members of the said board and shall be compensated as provided by section 59-509(b), Idaho Code.

§ 47-202. Meetings — Office — State geologist.

The advisory board shall hold an annual meeting at the university of Idaho, Boise state university or Idaho state university and such other meetings as it may determine. The chief office of said survey shall be maintained at the university of Idaho. The director of the survey shall report to the president of the university of Idaho through the vice president for research at the university of Idaho. The director, or a professional geologist in the survey if so appointed by the director, is designated state geologist.

§ 47-203. Duties — Publications — Cooperation with other agencies — Satellite offices.

It shall be the duty of the said state survey to conduct statewide studies in the field; laboratory studies; prepare and publish reports on the geology, hydrogeology, geologic hazards and mineral resources of the state; fix a price upon printed reports not used in exchange with other state bureaus or surveys, universities or public libraries, and deposit receipts from sales in a printing fund to be used for the preparation and publication of reports of the survey, and for no other purpose. The survey shall be allowed to seek and accept funded projects from and cooperative programs with other agencies for support of the survey’s research and service activities as authorized by the board of regents. All funds received from these projects shall be used for said projects and services. The survey shall be allowed to have satellite offices at the geology departments of Boise state university and Idaho state university.

§ 47-204. Reports.

The state geological survey shall annually, on or before the first day of January, make to the governor of the state and to the president of the university of Idaho a report detailing major events during the previous year concerning the geology and mineral resources of the state, a report of its expenditures and of the work of said survey during the preceding year, and budget requests for the following year; and it shall make a similar report of its doings and its expenditures to the state legislature through the legislative council.